Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
Subchapter 3
— Administration and Enforcement

Effective Dates.

Acts 1945, No. 202, § 2: Mar. 8, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that the proper administration of the Employment Security Division of the Department of Labor is a necessary function of the State Government, and that only the provisions of this act will make for better administration of said division. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1953, No. 162, § 22: July 1, 1953.

Acts 1953, No. 925, § 3: July 1, 1953.

Acts 1955, No. 325, § 30: July 1, 1955.

Acts 1963, No. 93, § 13: July 1, 1963.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 25: approved Feb. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an unemployment crisis exists in this State and in order to give better protection to the unemployed and their families extended benefits of the unemployment insurance program should be made available and to alleviate as much as possible the suffering and distress caused by unemployment, it is necessary to work in cooperation with the federal government; and in order to receive the benefits of federal law and comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 91-373, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 220, § 4: Mar. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the federal government provides group life insurance and group medical and hospital insurance for federal employees, that the federal government is, in a number of states, providing moneys to meet the employer obligation of providing group life insurance or group medical and hospital insurance for employees of the Employment Security Division of said States, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order to enable the employees of the Employment Security Division of the Department of Labor of the State of Arkansas to obtain the benefits of group life insurance and medical and hospital insurance. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 609, § 19: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 14: Jan. 30, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State of Arkansas are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the citizens of this State when they experience a period of unemployment and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1205, § 5: Feb. 11, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly, meeting in Extended Session, that there exists an urgent need to provide office facilities for the U.S. Department of Labor — Employment Security Division at various locations throughout the State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 376, § 21: approved Mar. 8, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to receive the benefits of Federal law and to comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 94-566 and in order to give better protection to the unemployed workers and their families, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1979, No. 252, § 5: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the expeditious disposition of claims under the Workers' Compensation Law and of judicial review of adjudications made by agencies subject to the Administrative Procedure Act are of great interest and concern to the State of Arkansas and the parties involved in such proceedings; and that the present system of judicial review has not been adequate to insure the prompt and final determination of the issues involved in such matters and, as a result, there has been undue delay to the prejudice of the State and the parties involved. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 537, § 15: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1979 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1979 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 43, § 22: Feb. 10, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to restore and insure solvency to the State's unemployment insurance trust fund from which unemployment benefits are paid to unemployed Arkansas workers and in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 96-364 and P.L. 96-499 and with P.L. 95-524, 96-249 and 96-265 so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 482, § 41: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to conform with P.L. 97-300 and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 97-248 and to insure the future solvency of the unemployment insurance fund so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, Nos. 8, 9, § 34: Jan. 30, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended by P.L. 98-21 and P.L. 98-369, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 293, § 4: Mar. 8, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to aid in the detection of errors and abuses in Federal programs and in order to reduce the number of errors and abuses, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 311, § 17: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1985, No. 923, § 4: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to aid in the detection of errors and abuses in Federal programs and in order to reduce the number of errors and abuses, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 672, § 13: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1083 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1987, No. 1003, § 5: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1205 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 420, § 17: Mar. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections, and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediately preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 238, § 19: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 869, § 5: Mar. 29, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that it is in the best interest of the people of the State of Arkansas that paternity of the children be established in the most expedient manner for all children of this state; and the smooth transition from current requirements of those of this act require the provisions to become effective immediately upon passage. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 6, § 21: Feb. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 519, § 14: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 32: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 19: Apr. 5, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1367, § 11: Apr. 5, 2001 and No. 1467, § 7, Apr. 10, 2001. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1223, § 15: Apr. 10, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 902, § 15: Mar. 16, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive tax credits under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits whenever they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 490, § 18: Mar. 26, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to make needed technical changes; to enable the state to capture and utilize penalty and interest owing from claimants; and in order that the state might continue to be in compliance with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 115, § 2: Feb. 23, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an immediate need exists to replace a dilapidated facility at Hope, Arkansas; that § 11-10-324 could be construed to mean that only federal funds could be used in entering into lease purchase agreements to meet the office needs of the Department of Workforce Services; and that this act is immediately necessary because a funding stream is presently available to finance the construction of new facilities and repeal of § 11-10-324 will clarify the authority of the department to receive and use that funding. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 907, § 15: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided:

“(a)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that federal law requires the implementation of state-level workforce development acts to authorize federal funding for workforce development programs; that the Arkansas Workforce Development Board must begin work immediately to prepare for the inauguration of local workforce development boards; that the first phase of work by the Arkansas Workforce Development Board must be completed to coincide with the beginning of the 2015-2016 fiscal year on July 1, 2015. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and § 15-4-37-3704 being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

“(b)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2015, is essential to the inauguration of the programs for which this act is provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 2015, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential programs created in the act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and, except for § 15-4-3704, this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 373, § 2: Mar. 8, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain employees and contractors of the Department of Workforce Services have access to confidential federal income tax information without having undergone a proper criminal background investigation; that to protect certain financial information, any individual that has access to confidential federal income tax information should have appropriate clearance; and that this act is immediately necessary because the Department of Workforce Services must conform with federal laws and regulations regarding confidential federal income tax information. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-301. Division of Workforce Services — Creation — Director.

There is created a division to be known as the “Division of Workforce Services”.

The division shall be administered by a full-time salaried director.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Commerce.

The director shall have resided in the state for at least five (5) years and shall be a qualified elector.

Before entering upon his or her duties, the director shall take and subscribe, and file in the office of the Secretary of State, an oath to support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution and to faithfully perform the duties of the office upon which he or she is about to enter.

The director shall have such power and authority as he or she deems reasonable and proper for the effective administration of this chapter and will faithfully perform his or her duties and properly account for all funds received and disbursed by him or her under authority of this chapter.

The director shall be the agent for service of process for all legal actions arising under this chapter or to which the division shall be named a party.

The director shall procure an official seal, and every paper executed by the director in pursuance of law and sealed with the seal of his or her office shall be received in evidence in any court or other tribunal in this state and may be recorded in the same manner and with like effect as instruments regularly acknowledged.

The director shall have the authority to institute and prosecute in his or her name, as such, all suits, certificates of assessment, and other proceedings necessary for the collection of any taxes or overpayments collectible by him or her and which have become delinquent.

No deposits of advance costs shall be required of the director in any suit or proceedings, nor shall he or she be required to give bond for costs, indemnity, or stay as a condition to the institution of any suit or proceedings, or to the issuance, service, or execution of any process therein, or ancillary thereto, or the appeal from any adverse action.

The director shall not be required to advance or pay any court costs to any court clerk for the institution or prosecution of any suit filed in his or her official capacity.

No bond shall be required of the director in obtaining restraining orders, injunctions, or in any other cases where a bond is required to be made by a litigant, including supersedeas bond upon appeal.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 10; 1945, No. 202, § 1; 1947, No. 398, § 10; 1955, No. 395, § 27; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1113, 81-1114; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, § 9; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 5; 1993, No. 6, § 3; 2005, No. 1705, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 187, 188.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, § 9. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1705 renamed the Arkansas Employment Security Department created in this section to be the Department of Workforce Services.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d).

11-10-302. Criminal background checks.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall establish a criminal background investigation policy for the Division of Workforce Services.

An employee of the Division of Workforce Services or of a contractor of the Division of Workforce Services who may be authorized by the director to access or view federal tax information as part of the employee's job duties shall authorize:

The director or his or her designee to obtain a state and federal criminal background check at the expense of the Division of Workforce Services; and

The release of the criminal background check results to the director or his or her designee.

The employee of the Division of Workforce Services or of a contractor of the Division of Workforce Services shall be subject to the policy established under subsection (a) of this section that shall include:

A criminal background check to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation that includes the taking of fingerprints;

A criminal background check that satisfies the background investigation standards established by the Internal Revenue Service with regard to access to federal tax information;

A criminal background check to be performed at least one (1) time every ten (10) years;

The Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police required to forward to the director or his or her designee all information obtained as a result of the criminal background check;

Information received from a criminal background check to be used only for the purpose of making decisions regarding the retention of an employee in a position in which access to federal tax information may be authorized;

Information received by the director or his or her designee from the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police under subdivision (b)(2)(D) of this section not to be released to any party other than the employee or his or her authorized representative; and

An employee who is employed by the Division of Workforce Services or by a contractor of the Division of Workforce Services required to notify the director or his or her designee of an arrest for a misdemeanor or felony offense within twenty-four (24) hours of the arrest.

Any information received under subdivision (b)(2)(G)(i) of this section shall be used only for the purpose of the director making a decision regarding retention of an employee following the arrest.

Failure to provide notice of a subsequent arrest under subdivision (b)(2)(G)(i) of this section is sufficient grounds for immediate termination of the employee's employment or other action as the director or his or her designee deems appropriate.

An applicant for employment with the Division of Workforce Services or with a contractor of the Division of Workforce Services who may be authorized by the director to access or view federal tax information as part of the applicant's job duties shall authorize:

The director or his or her designee to obtain a state and federal criminal background check at the expense of the Division of Workforce Services; and

The release of the criminal background check results to the director or his or her designee.

An applicant shall be subject to the policy established under subsection (a) of this section that shall include:

A criminal background check to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation that includes the taking of fingerprints;

A criminal background check that satisfies the background investigation standards established by the Internal Revenue Service with regard to access to federal tax information;

A criminal background check required to be performed before the applicant is employed and granted access to federal tax information and continued employment conditioned upon favorable information received from the criminal background check;

The Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police required to forward to the director or his or her designee all information obtained as a result of the criminal background check;

Information received from a criminal background check to be used only for the purpose of making decisions regarding the employment of an applicant in a position in which access to federal tax information may or will be authorized; and

Information received by the director or his or her designee from the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police under subdivision (c)(2)(D) of this section not to be released to any party other than the affected person or his or her authorized representative.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 373, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §
11-10-302, concerning the Arkansas Employment Security Department, service to food stamp applicants, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 490, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 537, §§ 9, 10; 1985, No. 311, §§ 12, 13; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1114.1, 81-1114.2; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 238, § 14; 1991, No. 100, § 6.